Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2044.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28A.225.0261 and 2021 c 119 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((By requiring an initial stay of truancy petitions for diversion to community engagement boards))The legislature intends to eliminate the option for school districts to file a truancy petition before a child's fifth unexcused absence. Instead, the legislature intends for school districts to enter into an attendance agreement with the parent or child if age eight or above, either directly or through a community engagement board. The legislature further intends that school districts be required to file a truancy petition only if the parent or child fails to comply with the attendance agreement or if no attendance agreement is reached.(2) With regard to the use of community engagement boards and other coordinated means of intervention, the legislature intends to achieve the following outcomes:(a) Increased access to ((community engagement boards and other truancy)) early intervention programs for parents and children throughout the state;(b) Increased quantity and quality of truancy intervention and prevention efforts in the community;(c) A reduction in the number of truancy petitions that result in further proceedings by juvenile courts((, other than dismissal of the petition, after the initial stay and diversion to a community engagement board));(d) A reduction in the number of truancy petitions that result in a civil contempt proceeding ((or detention order)); and(e) Increased school engagement and attendance.(((2) No later than January 1, 2021, the Washington state institute for public policy is directed to evaluate the effectiveness of chapter 205, Laws of 2016. An initial report scoping of the methodology to be used to review chapter 205, Laws of 2016 shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by January 1, 2018. The initial report must identify any data gaps that could hinder the ability of the institute to conduct its review.))Sec. 2. RCW 28A.225.015 and 2021 c 119 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If a parent enrolls a child who is six or seven years of age in a ((public)) school district, the child is required to attend public school and that parent has the responsibility to ensure the child attends for the full time that school is in session. An exception ((shall))must be made to this requirement for children whose parents formally remove them from enrollment if the child is less than eight years old and a petition has not been filed against the parent under subsection (3) of this section. The requirement to attend school under this subsection does not apply to a child enrolled in a ((public)) school district part-time for the purpose of receiving ancillary services. A child required to attend school under this subsection may be temporarily excused upon the request of his or her parent for purposes agreed upon by the school district and parent.(2) If a six or seven year old child is required to attend public school under subsection (1) of this section and that child has unexcused absences, the ((public)) school district in which the child is enrolled shall:(a) Inform the child's ((custodial)) parent((, parents, or guardian)) by a notice in writing or by telephone whenever the child has failed to attend school after one unexcused absence within any month during the current school year;(b) Request a conference or conferences with the ((custodial)) parent((, parents, or guardian)) and child at a time reasonably convenient for all persons included for the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's absences after three unexcused absences within any month during the current school year. If a regularly scheduled parent-teacher conference day is to take place within ((thirty))30 days of the third unexcused absence, then the school district may schedule this conference on that day; ((and))(c) Take steps to eliminate or reduce the child's absences. These steps ((shall)) include, where appropriate, adjusting the child's school program or school or course assignment, providing more individualized or remedial instruction, offering assistance in enrolling the child in available alternative schools or programs such as the Washington national guard youth challenge program, or assisting the parent or child to obtain supplementary services that may help eliminate or ameliorate the cause or causes for the absence from school; and(d) After the child's fifth unexcused absence within any month during the current school year, either enter into an attendance agreement with the parent or refer the child to a community engagement board under RCW 28A.225.025, so that the community engagement board can enter into an attendance agreement with the parent. The intervention and prevention steps listed in (c) of this subsection may be included in an attendance agreement.(3)(a) If a child is required to attend public school under subsection (1) of this section, ((after the child's seventh unexcused absence within any month during the current school year and not))no later than the child's 15th unexcused absence during the current school year, the school district shall file a petition and supporting affidavit for a civil action ((as provided in RCW 28A.225.035 against the parent of the child))with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010 by the parent of the child if either:(i) The school district or community engagement board fails to enter into an attendance agreement with the parent under subsection (2)(d) of this section within 20 days of initially meeting with the parent; or(ii) The parent fails to comply with an attendance agreement entered into under subsection (2)(d) of this section by the deadline set by the agreement.(b) If a child is required to attend public school under subsection (1) of this section, and the parent has complied with an attendance agreement entered into under subsection (2)(d) of this section, but the interventions and prevention efforts failed to substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences by the deadline specified in the agreement, the school district may, at its discretion, file a petition and supporting affidavit for a civil action with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010 by the parent of the child. The petition may be filed any time after the child's 15th unexcused absence during the current school year.(c) A petition filed under this subsection (3) must meet the requirements of RCW 28A.225.030(1)(c). The provisions of RCW 28A.225.030 (2) through (5) apply to this subsection (3).(4) This section does not require a six or seven year old child to enroll in a public or private school or to receive home-based instruction. This section only applies to six or seven year old children whose parents enroll them full time in ((public))a school district and do not formally remove them from enrollment as provided in subsection (1) of this section.Sec. 3. RCW 28A.225.020 and 2021 c 119 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If a child required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010 fails to attend school without valid justification, the ((public)) school district in which the child is enrolled shall:(a) Inform the child's parent by a notice in writing or by telephone whenever the child has failed to attend school after one unexcused absence within any month during the current school year. School officials shall inform the parent of the potential consequences of additional unexcused absences. If the parent is not fluent in English, the school must make reasonable efforts to provide this information in a language in which the parent is fluent;(b) Schedule a conference or conferences with the parent and child at a time reasonably convenient for all persons included for the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's absences after three unexcused absences within any month during the current school year. If a regularly scheduled parent-teacher conference day is to take place within ((thirty))30 days of the third unexcused absence, then the school district may schedule this conference on that day. If the child's parent does not attend the scheduled conference, the conference may be conducted with the ((student))child and school official. However, the parent ((shall))must be notified of the steps to be taken to eliminate or reduce the child's absence; ((and))(c) At some point after the second and before the ((seventh))fifth unexcused absence during the current school year, take data-informed steps to eliminate or reduce the child's absences. These steps must include:(i) In middle school and high school, ((these steps must include)) application of the Washington assessment of the risks and needs of students (WARNS) or other assessment by a school district's designee identified under RCW 28A.225.026((.));(ii) For any child with an existing individualized education ((plan))program or section 504 plan, ((these steps must include)) the convening of the child's individualized education ((plan))program or section 504 plan team, including a behavior specialist or mental health specialist where appropriate, to consider the reasons for the absences. If necessary, and if consent from the parent is given, a functional behavioral assessment to explore the function of the absence behavior ((shall))must be conducted and a detailed behavioral intervention plan completed. Time should be allowed for the behavioral intervention plan to be initiated and data tracked to determine progress((.));(iii) With respect to any child((,)) without an existing individualized education ((plan))program or section 504 plan((,)) reasonably believed to have a ((mental or physical)) disability ((or impairment, these steps must include)), informing the child's parent of the right to ((obtain))request an appropriate evaluation through the school district at no cost to the parent to determine whether the child has a disability ((or impairment)) and needs accommodations, related services, or special education services. ((This includes children with suspected emotional or behavioral disabilities as defined in WAC 392-172A-01035. If the school obtains consent to conduct an evaluation, time should be allowed for the evaluation to be completed, and if the child is found to be eligible for special education services, accommodations, or related services, a plan developed to address the child's needs.))If the school district decides to conduct an evaluation and obtains consent to evaluate, time should be allowed for the evaluation to be completed. If the child is found to have an eligible disability, an individualized education program or a section 504 plan must be developed to address the child's needs; and(iv) ((These steps must include, where))Where appropriate, providing an available approved best practice or research-based intervention, or both, consistent with the WARNS profile or other assessment, if an assessment was applied, adjusting the child's school program or school or course assignment, providing more individualized or remedial instruction, providing appropriate vocational courses or work experience, ((referring the child to a community engagement board,)) requiring the child to attend an alternative school or program, offering assistance in enrolling the child in the Washington national guard youth challenge program, or assisting the parent or child to obtain supplementary services that might eliminate or ameliorate the cause or causes for the absence from school; and(d) After the child's fifth unexcused absence within any month during the current school year, either enter into an attendance agreement with the child and parent or refer the child to a community engagement board under RCW 28A.225.025, so that the community engagement board can enter into an attendance agreement with the child and parent. The intervention and prevention efforts listed in (c)(iv) of this subsection may be included in an attendance agreement.(2) For purposes of this chapter, an "unexcused absence" means that a child:(a)(i) Has failed to attend the majority of hours or periods in an average school day or has failed to comply with a more restrictive school district policy; and(ii) Has failed to meet the school district's policy for excused absences; or(b) Has failed to comply with alternative learning experience program attendance requirements as described by the superintendent of public instruction.(3) If a child transfers from one school district to another school district during the school year, the receiving ((school or)) school district shall include the unexcused absences accumulated at ((the previous school or from)) the previous school district for purposes of this section((,))and RCW 28A.225.030((,)) and 28A.225.015. The sending school district shall provide this information to the receiving school district, together with a copy of any previous assessment as required under subsection (1)(c) of this section, history of any best practices or researched-based intervention previously provided to the child by the child's sending school district, any attendance agreement entered into as required under subsection (1)(d) of this section, and a copy of the most recent truancy information including any online or written acknowledgment by the parent and child, as provided for in RCW 28A.225.005. All school districts must use the standard choice transfer form for releasing a ((student))child to a nonresident school district for the purposes of accessing an alternative learning experience program.Sec. 4. RCW 28A.225.025 and 2021 c 119 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) For purposes of this chapter, "community engagement board" means a board established pursuant to a memorandum of understanding between a juvenile court and a school district and composed of members of the local community in which the child attends school.(b) Community engagement boards must include members who receive training regarding the identification of barriers to school attendance, the use of the Washington assessment of the risks and needs of students (WARNS) or other assessment tools to identify the specific needs of individual children, cultural responsive interactions, trauma-informed approaches to discipline, evidence-based treatments that have been found effective in supporting at-risk youth and their families, and the specific services and treatment available in the particular school, court, community, and elsewhere.(c) Duties of a community engagement board ((shall)) include, but ((not be))are not limited to: Identifying barriers to school attendance((,)); recommending methods for improving attendance, such as connecting ((students))children and their families with community services, culturally appropriate promising practices, and evidence-based services, such as functional family therapy((,)); suggesting to the school district that the child enroll in another school, an alternative education program such as the Washington national guard youth challenge program, an education center, a skill center, a dropout prevention program, or another public or private educational program((,)); or recommending ((to the juvenile court)) that a juvenile be offered the opportunity for placement in a HOPE center or crisis residential center, if appropriate.(d)(i) Except as provided in (d)(ii) of this subsection, within 20 days of referral, the community engagement board must meet with the child, a parent, and a representative of the school district. At the meeting, the community engagement board must enter into an attendance agreement with either the child and the parent, or the child and the school district.(ii) When a referral is made under RCW 28A.225.015, the six or seven year old child must not be required to attend the meeting, rather the community engagement board must enter into the attendance agreement with the parent and the school district.(iii) An attendance agreement entered into under this subsection (1)(d) must: (A) Describe the intervention and prevention efforts that will be made available to the child and the parent; (B) set forth the expectations for substantially reducing the child's unexcused absences; and (C) establish a deadline for compliance.(2) The legislature finds that utilization of community engagement boards is the preferred means of intervention when preliminary methods to eliminate or reduce unexcused absences as required by RCW 28A.225.015 and 28A.225.020 have not been effective in securing the child's attendance at school. The legislature intends to encourage and support the development and expansion of community engagement boards. Operation of a ((school truancy))community engagement board does not excuse a school district from the obligation of filing a petition within the requirements of RCW 28A.225.015(3)(a) or 28A.225.030(1)(a).Sec. 5. RCW 28A.225.030 and 2021 c 119 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) If a child under the age of ((seventeen))17 is required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010 ((and if the actions taken by a school district under RCW 28A.225.020 are not successful in substantially reducing an enrolled student's absences from public school, after the child's seventh unexcused absence within any month during the current school year and not later than the)), no later than the child's 15th unexcused absence during the current school year the school district shall file a petition and supporting affidavit for a civil action with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010((: (a) By))by the parent((; (b) by)), the child((; or (c) by)), or both the parent and the child if either:(i) The school district or community engagement board fails to enter into an attendance agreement with the child and parent under RCW 28A.225.020(1)(d) within 20 days of initially meeting with the parent or the child; or(ii) The parent or the child fails to comply with an attendance agreement entered into under RCW 28A.225.020(1)(d) by the deadline set by the agreement.(b) If a child under the age of 17 is required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010, and the parent or child, or both, has complied with an attendance agreement entered into under RCW 28A.225.020(1)(d), but the interventions and prevention efforts fail to substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences by the deadline specified in the agreement, the school district may, at its discretion, file a petition and supporting affidavit for a civil action with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010 by the parent, the child, or both the parent and the child. The petition may be filed any time after the child's 15th unexcused absence during the current school year.(c) The petition must include a list of all interventions that have been attempted as set forth in RCW 28A.225.020, include a copy of any attendance agreement entered into under RCW 28A.225.020(1)(d), include a copy of any previous truancy assessment completed by the child's current school district, the history of approved best practices intervention or research-based intervention previously provided to the child by the child's current school district, and a copy of the most recent truancy information document provided to the parent, pursuant to RCW 28A.225.005. Except as provided in this subsection, no additional documents need be filed with the petition.(2) Nothing in this ((subsection))section requires court jurisdiction to terminate when a child turns ((seventeen))17 or precludes a school district from filing a petition for a child that is ((seventeen))17 years of age.(((2) The district shall not later than the seventh unexcused absence in a month:(a) Enter into an agreement with a student and parent that establishes school attendance requirements;(b) Refer a student to a community engagement board as defined in RCW 28A.225.025. The community engagement board shall enter into an agreement with the student and parent that establishes school attendance requirements and take other appropriate actions to reduce the child's absences; or(c) File a petition under subsection (1) of this section.))(3) The petition may be filed by a school district employee who is not an attorney.(4) If the school district fails to file a petition under this section, the parent of a child with ((seven))five or more unexcused absences in any month during the current school year or upon the 15th unexcused absence during the current school year may file a petition with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010.(5) Petitions filed under this section may be served by certified mail, return receipt requested. If such service is unsuccessful, or the return receipt is not signed by the addressee, personal service is required.Sec. 6. RCW 28A.225.035 and 2021 c 119 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A petition for a civil action under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015 ((shall))must consist of a written notification to the court alleging that:(a) The child has unexcused absences ((as described in RCW 28A.225.030(1)))exceeding five in any month during the current school year;(b) Actions taken by the school district have not been successful in substantially reducing the child's unexcused absences from school; and(c) Court intervention and supervision are necessary to assist the school district or parent to reduce the child's unexcused absences from school.(2) The petition ((shall))must set forth the name, date of birth, school, address, gender, race, and ethnicity of the child and the names and addresses of the child's parents, and ((shall))must set forth the languages in which the child and parent are fluent, whether there is an existing individualized education program, and the child's current academic status in school.(3) The petition ((shall))must set forth facts that support the allegations in this section and ((shall))must generally request relief available under this chapter and provide information about what the court might order under RCW 28A.225.090.(4)(a) ((When a petition is filed under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015, it shall initially be stayed by the juvenile court, and the child and the child's parent must be referred to a community engagement board or other coordinated means of intervention as set forth in the memorandum of understanding under RCW 28A.225.026. The community engagement board must provide to the court a description of the intervention and prevention efforts to be employed to substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences, along with a timeline for completion.(b) If a community engagement board or other coordinated means of intervention is not in place as required by RCW 28A.225.026, the juvenile court shall schedule a hearing at which the court shall consider the petition.(5) When a referral is made to a community engagement board, the community engagement board must meet with the child, a parent, and the school district representative and enter into an agreement with the petitioner and respondent regarding expectations and any actions necessary to address the child's truancy within twenty days of the referral. If the petition is based on RCW 28A.225.015, the child shall not be required to attend and the agreement under this subsection shall be between the community engagement board, the school district, and the child's parent. The court may permit the community engagement board or truancy prevention counselor to provide continued supervision over the student, or parent if the petition is based on RCW 28A.225.015.(6) If the community engagement board fails to reach an agreement, or the parent or student does not comply with the agreement within the timeline for completion set by the community engagement board, the community engagement board shall return the case to the juvenile court. The stay of the petition shall be lifted, and the juvenile court shall schedule a hearing at which the court shall consider the petition.(7)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (4)(a) of this section, a hearing shall not be))A hearing is not required if other actions by the court would substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences. Such actions may include referral to an existing community engagement board or other coordinated means of intervention established under RCW 28A.225.026, use of the Washington assessment of risks and needs of students (WARNS) or other assessment tools to identify the specific needs of individual children, the provision of community-based services, and the provision of evidence-based treatments that have been found to be effective in supporting at-risk youth and their families.(b) When a juvenile court hearing is held, the court shall:(i) Separately notify the child, the parent of the child, and the school district of the hearing. If the parent is not fluent in English, notice should be provided in a language in which the parent is fluent as indicated on the petition pursuant to RCW 28A.225.015(3)(a) or 28A.225.030(1)(a);(ii) Notify the parent and the child of their rights to present evidence at the hearing; and(iii) Notify the parent and the child of the options and rights available under chapter 13.32A RCW.(((b)))(c) If the child is not provided with counsel, the advisement of rights must take place in court by means of a colloquy between the court, the child if eight years old or older, and the parent.(((8)))(5)(a) The court may require the attendance of the child if eight years old or older, the parents, and the school district at any hearing on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030.(b) The court may not issue a bench warrant for a child for failure to appear at a hearing on an initial truancy petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030. If there has been proper service, the court may instead enter a default order assuming jurisdiction under the terms specified in subsection (((12)))(9) of this section.(((9)))(6) A school district is responsible for determining who shall represent the school district at hearings on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015.(((10)))(7) The court may permit the first hearing to be held without requiring that either party be represented by legal counsel, and to be held without a guardian ad litem for the child under RCW 4.08.050. At the request of the school district, the court shall permit a school district representative who is not an attorney to represent the school district at any future hearings.(((11)))(8) If the child is in a special education program or has a diagnosed mental or emotional disorder, the court shall inquire as to what efforts the school district has made to assist the child in attending school.(((12)))(9) If the allegations in the petition are established by a preponderance of the evidence, the court shall grant the petition and enter an order assuming jurisdiction to intervene for the period of time determined by the court, after considering the facts alleged in the petition and the circumstances of the ((juvenile))child, to most likely cause the ((juvenile))child to return to and remain in school while the ((juvenile))child is subject to this chapter. In no case may the order expire before the end of the school year in which it is entered.(((13)))(10)(a) If the court assumes jurisdiction, the school district shall periodically report to the court any additional unexcused absences by the child, actions taken by the school district, and an update on the child's academic status in school at a schedule specified by the court.(b) The first report under this subsection (((13)))(10) must be received no later than three months from the date that the court assumes jurisdiction.(((14)))(11) Community engagement boards and the courts shall coordinate, to the extent possible, proceedings and actions pertaining to children who are subject to truancy petitions and at-risk youth petitions in RCW 13.32A.191 or child in need of services petitions in RCW 13.32A.140.(((15)))(12) If after a juvenile court assumes jurisdiction in one county the child relocates to another county, the juvenile court in the receiving county shall, upon the request of a school district or parent, assume jurisdiction of the petition filed in the previous county.Sec. 7. RCW 28A.225.090 and 2021 c 119 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A court may order a child subject to a petition under RCW 28A.225.035 to do one or more of the following:(a) Attend the child's current school, and set forth minimum attendance requirements, which shall not consider a suspension day as an unexcused absence;(b) If there is space available and the program can provide educational services appropriate for the child, order the child to attend another public school, an alternative education program, center, a skill center, dropout prevention program, the Washington national guard youth challenge program, or another public educational program;(c) Attend a private nonsectarian school or program including an education center. Before ordering a child to attend an approved or certified private nonsectarian school or program, the court shall: (i) Consider the public and private programs available; (ii) find that placement is in the best interest of the child; and (iii) find that the private school or program is willing to accept the child and will not charge any fees in addition to those established by contract with the student's school district. If the court orders the child to enroll in a private school or program, the child's school district shall contract with the school or program to provide educational services for the child. The school district shall not be required to contract for a weekly rate that exceeds the state general apportionment dollars calculated on a weekly basis generated by the child and received by the district. A school district shall not be required to enter into a contract that is longer than the remainder of the school year. A school district shall not be required to enter into or continue a contract if the child is no longer enrolled in the district;(d) Submit to a substance abuse assessment if the court finds on the record that such assessment is appropriate to the circumstances and behavior of the child and will facilitate the child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law and, if any assessment, including a urinalysis test ordered under this subsection indicates the use of controlled substances or alcohol, order the minor to abstain from the unlawful consumption of controlled substances or alcohol and adhere to the recommendations of the substance abuse assessment at no expense to the school; or(e) Submit to a mental health evaluation or other diagnostic evaluation and adhere to the recommendations of the drug assessment, at no expense to the school, if the court finds on the court records that such evaluation is appropriate to the circumstances and behavior of the child, and will facilitate the child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law.(2) If the child fails to comply with the court order, the court may impose:(a) Community restitution;(b) Nonresidential programs with intensive wraparound services;(c) A requirement that the child meet with a mentor for a specified number of times; or(d) Other services and interventions that the court deems appropriate.(3) Any parent violating any of the provisions of either RCW 28A.225.010, 28A.225.015, or 28A.225.080 shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars for each day of unexcused absence from school. The court shall remit fifty percent of the fine collected under this section to the child's school district. It shall be a defense for a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 to show that he or she exercised reasonable diligence in attempting to cause a child in his or her custody to attend school or that the child's school did not perform its duties as required in RCW 28A.225.020. The court may order the parent to provide community restitution instead of imposing a fine. Any fine imposed pursuant to this section may be suspended upon the condition that a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 shall participate with the school and the child in a supervised plan for the child's attendance at school or upon condition that the parent attend a conference or conferences scheduled by a school for the purpose of analyzing the causes of a child's absence.(4) If a child continues to be truant after entering into a court-approved order with the community engagement board under RCW 28A.225.035, the juvenile court shall find the child in contempt, and the court may impose alternatives to detention consistent with best practice models for reengagement with school.(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the court's inherent contempt power or curtail its exercise.(6) Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section shall not apply to a six or seven year old child required to attend public school under RCW 28A.225.015.Sec. 8. RCW 28A.225.151 and 2021 c 119 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As required under subsection (2) of this section, the office of superintendent of public instruction shall collect and school districts shall submit student-level truancy data in order to allow a better understanding of actions taken under RCW ((28A.225.030))28A.225.015, 28A.225.020, and 28A.225.030, and sections 11 and 12 of this act. The office shall prepare an annual report to the legislature by December 15th of each year, which must be submitted in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.(2) The reports under subsection (1) of this section ((shall))must include, disaggregated by student group:(a) The number of enrolled students and the number of unexcused absences;(b) The number of enrolled students with 15 or more unexcused absences in a school year or ((seven))five or more unexcused absences in a month during a school year;(c) A description of any programs or schools developed to serve students who have had ((seven))five or more unexcused absences in a month ((or 15 in a))during a school year or 15 or more unexcused absences in a school year including information about the number of students in the program or school and the number of unexcused absences of students during and after participation in the program. The school district shall also describe any placements in an approved private nonsectarian school or program or certified program under an attendance agreement entered into under RCW 28A.225.015(2)(d) or 28A.225.020(1)(d) or a court order under RCW 28A.225.090;(d)(i) The number of attendance agreements entered into directly with a student and parent;(ii) The number of students referred to a community engagement board;(iii) The number of attendance agreements entered into by a community engagement board and a student or the parent;(e) The number of truancy petitions filed ((by a school district)) with the juvenile court and((, beginning in the 2018-19 school year,)) whether the petition results in:(i) Referral to a community engagement board;(ii) Other coordinated means of intervention;(iii) A hearing in the juvenile court; or(iv) Other less restrictive disposition (e.g., change of placement, home school, alternative learning experience, residential treatment); and(((e)))(f) Each instance of imposition of detention for failure to comply with a court order under RCW 28A.225.090, with a statement of the reasons for each instance of detention.(3) To the extent that the office identifies disparities between students or schools with differing characteristics, the data specified under subsection (2) of this section in the reports under subsection (1) of this section must be disaggregated by: Grade band; gender; race and ethnicity as described in RCW 28A.300.042(1); school district, charter school, or state-tribal education compact school of last enrollment; educational service district or other applicable geographical region; family income level; disability status, if any; and any other relevant student or school characteristics.(4) A report required under this section ((shall))may not disclose the name or other identification of a child or parent.(((4)))(5) The K-12 data governance group shall develop the data protocols and guidance for school districts in the collection of data to provide a clearer understanding of actions taken under RCW ((28A.225.030))28A.225.015, 28A.225.020, and 28A.225.030, and sections 11 and 12 of this act.Sec. 9. RCW 2.56.140 and 1996 c 134 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:The administrator for the courts shall prepare a report for each school year to be submitted to the legislature, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, no later than December 15th of each year that summarizes the disposition of petitions filed with the juvenile court under RCW 28A.225.015 and 28A.225.030. The report must describe and categorize the court's orders and any penalties imposed for failure to comply with the orders, including the number of contempt orders issued to enforce a court's order ((under RCW 28A.225.030)).Sec. 10. RCW 28A.225.900 and 2021 c 119 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and sections 11 and 12 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 28A.710 RCW to read as follows:RCW 28A.225.005, 28A.225.010 through 28A.225.030, 28A.225.035, 28A.225.060, and 28A.225.151 govern school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and apply to charter schools established under this chapter to the same extent as it applies to school districts.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 28A.715 RCW to read as follows:RCW 28A.225.005, 28A.225.010 through 28A.225.030, 28A.225.035, 28A.225.060, and 28A.225.151 govern school operation and management under RCW 28A.715.020 and apply to state-tribal education compact schools subject to this chapter to the same extent as it applies to school districts.--- END ---